District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
36 act may be cited as the “Education Continuity for Students in the Care of D.C. Amendment Act
37 of 2025.”
1

38 Sec. 2. The Educational Services for Detained and Committed Youth Act of 2006,
39 effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 38-3301 et seq.), is amended as
40 follows:
41 (a) A new section 4031(a) is added to read as follows:
42 “Sec. 4031(a). Definitions.
43 “For the purpose of this subtitle, the term:
44 “(1) “Appropriate educational placement” means a learning environment that
45 supports the educational needs of a general education student or student with special needs to
46 enable them to make academic progress towards graduation and implement all aspects of a
47 student’s IEP, if applicable.
48 “(2) “Awaiting placement” means the status of a committed youth under the
49 supervision of DYRS who is waiting to be transferred to the placement DYRS decides is
50 appropriate.
51 “(3) “Certificate of Approval” or “COA” shall have the same meaning as
52 provided in section 101 of the Placement of Students with Disabilities in nonpublic Schools
53 Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-269; D.C. Official Code § 38-
54 2561.01(1A)).
55 “(4) “CFSA” means the Child and Family Services Agency established by
56 section 301a of the Prevention of Child Abuse and Neglect Act of 1977, effective April 4, 2001
57 (D.C. Law 13-1277; D.C. Official Code § 4-1303.01a).
58 “(5) “Change in placement” means a change in the location where a young
59 person committed to the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services resides and receives the
60 recommended rehabilitation services.
2

61 “(6) “DCPS” means the District of Columbia Public Schools established by
62 section 102 of the Public Education Reform Amendment Act of 2007, effective June 12, 2007
63 (D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code § 38-171) and, for the purposes of this Act, the local
64 education agency in the District of Columbia with responsibility for serving District of
65 Columbia youth committed to DYRS who are placed in RTCs, PRTFs, and out-of-state (OOS)
66 group homes.
67 “(7) “DOC” means the Department of Corrections.
68 “(8) “DYRS” means the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services.
69 “(9) “FERPA” means the Family Educational Rights & Privacy Act of 1974,
70 approved August 21, 1974 (88 Stat. 571; 20 U.S.C. § 1232g et seq.);
71 “(10) “FAPE” means free appropriate public education or special education and
72 related services that:
73 (A) Have been provided at public expense, under public supervision and
74 direction, and without charge;
75 “(B) Meet the standards of the State Education Agency;
76 “(C) Include an appropriate preschool, elementary school, or secondary
77 school education; and
78 “(D) Are provided in conformity with the individualized education
79 program.
80 “(11) “Individualized education program” or “IEP” means a written plan that
81 specifies the special education programs and services to be provided to meet the unique
82 educational needs of a student with a disability, as required under section 614(d) of the IDEA [20
83 U.S.C. § 1414(d)].
3

84 “(12) “Section 504 Plan" means a written plan that specifies the accommodations
85 and services provided to a student pursuant to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
86 approved September 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 394; 29 U.S.C. § 794), and its implementing regulations.
87 “(13) “Local education agency” or “LEA” means an educational institution at the
88 local level that exists primarily to operate a publicly funded school or schools in the District of
89 Columbia, including the District of Columbia Public Schools and a District of Columbia public
90 charter school. For the purposes of this chapter, an LEA also includes a state public agency
91 responsible for providing FAPE.”
92 “(14) “OSSE” means the Office of the State Superintendent of Education
93 established by section 2 of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-
94 176; D.C. Official Code § 38-2601).
95 “(15) “Public Charter School Board” or “PCSB” means the Public Charter School
96 Board as established by section 2214 of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995,
97 approved April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 28-1802.14).
98 “(16) “State education agency” or “SEA” means the Office of the State
99 Superintendent of Education, or any successor agency that has primary responsibility for the
100 state-level supervisory functions for special education that are typically handled by a state
101 department of education or public instruction, a state board of education, a state education
102 commission, or a state education authority.
103 “(17) “Students in the care of D.C.” or “student in the care of D.C.” shall have the
104 same meaning as provided in section 2(5) of the Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating
105 Committee Act of 2018, effective April 11, 2019 (D.C. Law 22-303; D.C. Official Code § 2-
106 1599.01(5)).
4

107 “(18) “Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee” or “SCDC” means
108 the Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee established by section 3 of the
109 Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee Act of 2018, effective April 11, 2019
110 (D.C. Law 22-303; D.C. Official Code § 2-1599.02).
111 “(19) “Transfer grade report” means a report created by sending LEA that
112 includes progress in current classes, current grades and course standards.”.
113 (b) Section 4032 (D.C. Official Code § 38-3301) is amended to read as follows:
114 “Sec. 4032. Timely enrollment and transition planning.
115 “(a) A student returning from or transitioning into agency placements shall be enrolled in
116 an appropriate educational placement within 2 days after release or 2 days after transfer. In
117 instances where the LEA is unable to secure an appropriate placement for the student within the
118 timeframe set forth in this subsection despite making their best efforts, the receiving LEA shall
119 provide the student with interim educational services that comport with the student's IEP, if
120 applicable, and allows the student to continue to make academic progress towards graduation,
121 until such time as the student is transitioned to an appropriate educational placement.
122 “(b) A student who is awaiting placement must be enrolled in and attending an accredited
123 school.
124 “(c) The transition team for a student in the Care of D.C. shall meet to establish or update
125 a transition plan at least 30 days before the student’s change in placement or at least 7 days
126 before a Court appearance. If a student is in a placement for less than 30 days, the transition plan
127 shall be created within 7 days before a change in placement.
128 “(d) The student’s transition team shall include:
5

129 “(1) The student if the transition plan being created or updated will be in effect at
130 any time after the student turns 14 years old;
131 “(2) A representative of the student’s current educational placement;
132 “(3) A representative of the student’s current LEA;
133 “(4) A representative of the student’s anticipated LEA, where known;
134 “(5) A representative of the student’s anticipated educational placement where the
135 placement is distinct from the LEA, where known;
136 “(6) The student’s parent or guardian or other person with educational decision-
137 making rights for the student; and
138 “(7) The student’s education attorney, defense attorney, social worker, and
139 guardian ad litem, as applicable.
140 “(e) The student’s transition plan shall:
141 “(1) Include a clear statement of the student’s appropriate educational placement;
142 “(2) Include the student’s enrollment date for the current placement, past and
143 present academic transcripts and most recent report card, course requirements of previous and
144 prospective anticipated educational placement, documentation of any other supportive activities
145 or services, and any diagnostic, summative, or college assessments as applicable, and graduation
146 requirements;
147 “(3) Include, for students with disabilities, a discussion of appropriate changes to
148 the IEP or 504 Plan, include a copy of the student’s current IEP or 504 Plan, including any prior
149 written notice and the location of service, if applicable;
6

150 “(4) List the names and contact information of the persons responsible for
151 developing the student’s transition plan at the student’s current and anticipated educational
152 placement;
153 “(5) List the names and contact information of the persons with responsibility and
154 authority for prompt enrollment; and
155 “(6) Include, if the student is in need of a placement at a school that requires a
156 student interview or school visit prior to acceptance, a description of the efforts to complete the
157 interview process virtually or provide other necessary accommodations.
158 “(f) Within 7 days after the transition meeting, a copy of the student’s transition plan
159 shall be provided to the student and all members of the student’s transition team.
160 (c) New sections 4033 through 4035 are added to read as follows:
161 “Sec. 4033. School points-of-contact for students in the care of D.C.
162 “(a) Each LEA shall designate at least one employee to serve as the point-of-contact for
163 students in the care of D.C. attending the LEA who shall carry out the duties described in
164 subsection (c) of this section. For students in the care of CFSA, the LEA may designate as point-
165 of-contact the same employee who is designated as the foster care point-of-contact under as
166 established by section 2214 of the District of Columbia School Reform Act of 1995, approved
167 April 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 1321; D.C. Official Code § 28-1802.14).
168 “(b) Up-to-date name and contact information for the point-of-contact shall be published
169 on the LEA’s website.
170 “(c) The point-of-contact described in subsection (a) of this section shall be responsible
171 for:
7

172 “(1) Ensuring that the student is immediately enrolled in the student’s new
173 placement even in the absence of records from the student’s previous placement that are
174 normally required for enrollment;
175 “(2) Ensuring that a student’s new educational placement is capable of providing
176 the student with all special education, related services, and accommodations with a direct path
177 towards graduation;
178 “(3) Communicating with the student’s last school attended to obtain relevant and
179 up to date academic and other records, including any necessary course descriptions, within 5
180 days after the student's enrollment in the student’s new educational placement;
181 “(4) Performing a transcript audit, calculating all partial and full credits towards
182 current graduation requirements, including transfer of credits earned by the student at any
183 previous school attended, within 7 days after receiving a transcript;
184 “(5) Providing a copy of the transcript evaluation to the student’s parent or legal
185 guardian, adult student, guardian ad litem, and education attorney, as applicable, within 1 day
186 after the completion of the evaluation; and
187 “(6) Working collaboratively with the prior placement to ensure that the student is
188 scheduled in courses that will enable the student to make academic progress towards a high
189 school diploma or IEP Certificate of Completion, as applicable.
190 “(g) For students transferring out of an LEA, the point-of-contact shall be responsible for
191 providing all student records to the new LEA within 7 days after the transfer.
192 “(h) OSSE shall develop training and guidance and make the materials available to
193 teachers, educational and agency staff with knowledge and skills necessary to respond to the
194 specific needs of students in the Care of D.C., where applicable”
8

195 “Sec. 4034. Facilitating records transmission among agencies.
196 “OSSE shall:
197 “(a) Grant DYRS, DOC, and CFSA access to the following information for a student in
198 the care of D.C. for the purpose of enrolling a student in a new school:
199 “(1) The student’s name;
200 “(2) Date of birth;
201 “(3) Race and ethnicity;
202 “(4) Unique student identifiers;
203 “(5) Information on student’s previously attended LEA;
204 “(6) Previous home address;
205 “(7) Assessment data;
206 “(8) Enrollment data, both current and historical;
207 “(9) Last grade completed;
208 “(10) Advanced placement data;
209 “(11) College Board Test data;
210 “(12) ACCESS assessment results for students who have limited English
211 proficiency;
212 “(13) Special education records, including but not limited to assessment data, and
213 the student’s IEP (current and historical), IEP meeting notes or minutes, eligibility
214 determinations, related service records/logs, evaluations, as applicable; and
215 “(14) Section 504 records, including but not limited to assessment data, the
216 student’s 504 plan (current and historical), 504 plan meeting notes or minutes, eligibility
217 determinations, related service records/logs, evaluations, as applicable;
9

218 “(15) Transcript, course enrollment prior to transfer, progress reports (or
219 equivalent term grade report).
220 “(b) Provide DYRS, DOC and CFSA with access to the District’s special education data
221 system in order to view the records of the students in their custody in accordance with District
222 and federal law.
223 “(c) Where DYRS or DOC is responsible for FAPE, provide the respective agency with
224 education and special education database access equivalent to access given to other LEAs in the
225 District.
226 “(d) Allow for dual enrollment of students in the care of D.C. in both the sending and
227 receiving school such that each placement can access information necessary to award credits in a
228 timely manner.
229 “Sec. 4035. Identifying an appropriate educational placement and ensuring enrollment in
230 appropriate coursework.
231 “(a) Upon a student’s enrollment in an LEA, a student shall be assigned coursework that
232 the student needs to complete to satisfy unfulfilled graduation requirements.
233 “(b) A student in the care of D.C. shall be provided access to any courses or programs
234 needed to fulfil the student’s graduation requirements, including community service
235 opportunities.
236 “(c) For those students in the care of D.C. who are entering from an educational
237 placement outside the District, OSSE shall pursue reciprocity agreements for the purposes of
238 securing access to necessary student records to complete the transfer.
239 Sec. 3. The State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; D.C.
240 Official Code § 38-2601 et seq.) is amended by adding new sections 3b-3f to read as follows:
10

241 “Sec. 3b. Creation of a Uniform Transcript Evaluation Procedure.
242 “(a) Beginning in school year 2026-2027, OSSE shall develop, publish, and regularly
243 update a general course catalogue and course equivalency table that groups course credits into
244 categories. LEAs shall determine whether courses completed outside of the District fulfill their
245 individual graduation requirements. The course catalogue shall include:
246 “(1) The name of every credit-bearing course approved to be offered to students at
247 any secondary school within the District of Columbia, regardless of whether the course is
248 presently offered;
249 “(2) A brief description of each course named;
250 “(3) A list of course requirements and pre-requisites; and
251 “(4) An indication of which promotion or graduation requirement(s) that each
252 course fulfills.
253 “(b) Beginning in school year 2026-2027, each LEA shall adopt and implement a uniform
254 procedure for evaluating the transcripts of students transferring into the LEA who have
255 completed coursework elsewhere. The evaluation procedure shall:
256 “(1) Be transparent and publicly available a central website managed by OSSE;
257 “(2) Be based upon the OSSE’s published course catalogue;
258 “(3) Ensure credits and partial credits completed outside the District are honored
259 and accepted by the prospective LEA;
260 “(4) Establish methods by which the LEA shall determine equivalent credits
261 within the LEA’s course catalogue for coursework completed elsewhere;
262 “(5) Establish guidelines by which an evaluator may grant quarter or semester
263 credits for coursework completed prior to a student’s transfer;
11

264 “(6) Ensure proper course and program enrollment for students transferring into
265 the LEA.
266 “(c) The LEA shall provide a copy of the transcript evaluation to the placing agency, the
267 student, the student’s parent or legal guardian, and the guardian ad litem, as applicable, within 5
268 days after enrollment into a Residential Treatment Center, Psychiatric Residential Treatment
269 Facility, or any other out-of-state placement.
270 “(d) Each LEA shall develop and implement a process by which a student, the student’s
271 parent or legal guardian, or the student’s attorney may appeal a transcript evaluation.”
272 “Sec. 3c. Awarding of credits.
273 “(a) An LEA shall grant credit for academic coursework necessary for high school
274 graduation that were completed by a student in the care of D.C.
275 “(b) Students shall be placed in facilities with accredited schools where they can
276 complete the courses necessary for graduation with a high school diploma, certificate track or
277 GED, depending on the individual student’s completion plan.
278 “(c) An LEA shall provide official copies of a student’s transcript, report card and
279 transfer grade report within 7 days after withdrawal.
280 “(d) For students in the care of D.C. unable to complete an academic course and receive
281 full credit due to the student’s withdrawal or transfer from the school or LEA, a receiving school
282 or LEA shall accept partial credits that are stackable such that they accrue until complete credit
283 for a course is achieved; moreover, the receiving school or LEA shall provide an opportunity for
284 the completion of the course.
285 “(e) An LEA shall:
12

286 “(1) Accept partial credits and/or coursework completed granted by the student’s
287 previous school or LEA;
288 “(2) Apply any partial credits to the closest equivalent course and to any
289 graduation requirements fulfilled by that equivalent course as if the student has completed the
290 courses and earn a final grade and credit for courses in which they are enrolled after the start of a
291 grading period without term grades issued by their previous school or LEA.
292 “(3) If the student enrolls in a school or LEA without any credits from the sending
293 school or LEA, the receiving school or LEA shall afford the student the opportunity to complete
294 and earn a final grade and credit for courses in which they are enrolled after the start of a grading
295 period, which they began at their sending school or LEA, or allow for the student to complete a
296 diagnostic assessment to measure their content mastery to award credit.
297 “Sec. 3d. Flexible graduation options and course waivers.
298 “(a) Within 5 days after any change to a student’s schedule of courses, the student's
299 sending LEA shall approve the student’s new courses and, for high school students, identify
300 which outstanding graduation requirements each course will fulfill upon the student’s return.
301 “(b) An LEA responsible for a student placed in an out-of-state placement shall offer
302 options to complete D.C. graduation requirements not offered by the out-of-state placement.
303 “(c) OSSE shall establish a system by which LEAs, upon approval by OSSE, may waive
304 graduation requirements in situations where a student in the care of D.C. was placed outside of
305 D.C. and was thus unable to take a substantially similar course that would fulfill the relevant
306 requirement but instead satisfactorily completed a different course that would not otherwise
307 contribute to that student's D.C. graduation requirements.
13

308 “(d) “OSSE shall reduce the community service requirement by the proportion of time a
309 student has been placed out-of-state between the commencement of high school and their
310 expected graduation date.”
311 “(e) OSSE shall establish a system by which LEAs may waive community service
312 requirements in situations where a student in the care of D.C. was not provided access to such
313 opportunities.
314 “(f) Should a waiver be denied by the LEA, the LEA shall provide, in writing, a
315 reasonable justification for the denial of the waiver within 7 days after the request for a waiver.
316 The LEA shall indicate an available alternative means of acquiring the graduation requirements
317 such that the student may graduate on time.
318 “Sec. 3e. Monitoring.
319 “(a) OSSE shall conduct desktop and on-site monitoring of educational programs
320 including local and out-of-state placements inclusive of COA and non-COA facilities where
321 students in the care of D.C. are placed a minimum of 2 times per school year for desktop and on-
322 site monitoring.
323 “(b) If the results of desktop and on-site monitoring require corrective actions be taken,
324 OSSE shall ensure the placement takes the steps outlined in the corrective action plan.
325 “(c) Where a placement fails to sufficiently comply with OSSE’s corrective action plan,
326 OSSE shall remove any students in the care of D.C. from the placement and prevent future
327 placements until such time as OSSE is satisfied with the placement’s performance of the
328 corrective action plan.
329 “(d) OSSE shall post the required corrective actions on their website within 30 days after
330 the determination that a corrective action is required.
14

331 “(e) The results of all monitoring activities and all corrective action plans in a given
332 school year shall be made publicly available annually on OSSE’s website in the same manner in
333 which OSSE publishes other data and reports.”.
334 “Sec. 3f. Rulemaking authority.
335 “No later than 120 days after the applicability date of this act, OSSE shall promulgate
336 rules to implement the provisions of this act.”.
337 Sec. 4. Section 7 of The Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee Act of
338 2018, effective April 11, 2019 (D.C. Official Code 2-1599.06), is amended as follows:
339 (a) Sub-subsection (c)(1) is amended to read as follows:
340 “(1) The Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee shall report:
341 “(A) Within 24 months following the applicability date of this act, and on an
342 annual basis thereafter, on the status and progress of each member agency on fulfilling the goal
343 in subsection (a) of this section and the strategic plan referenced in subsection (d) of this section;
344 and
345 “(B)Within 24 months following the applicability date of the Education
346 Continuity for Students in the Care of D.C. Amendment Act of 2025, and annually thereafter, on
347 the implementation and impact of the Education Continuity for Students in the Care of D.C.
348 Amendment Act of 2025. The report shall include the results of a random case file review at least
349 once every school year. The Students in the Care of D.C. Coordinating Committee shall
350 determine the process for student monitoring and the selection of case files for randomized
351 review.
352 (b) Sub-subsection (c)(2) is amended to read as follows:
15

353 “(2) The Coordinating Committee shall make publicly available and transmit the reports
354 in subsection (c)(1) of this section to the Mayor and the Council.”.
355 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
356 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
357 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
358 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
359 Sec. 6. Effective date.
360 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
361 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
362 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
363 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
364 Columbia Register.
16